District of Columbia statutes.
7-228

Effective date.

(a)

Sections 7-202, 7-203, and 7-226 (including the authority to issue regulations to implement the entire chapter) shall take effect after a 30-day period of Congressional review following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor, action by the Council of the District of Columbia to override the veto) as provided in § 1-206.02(c)(1).

(b)

All other sections of this chapter shall take effect 60 days after the date provided in subsection (a) of this section.

Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-34, § 31, 28 DCR 3271
1981 Ed., § 6-228.